test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-neitst_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - neitst: # Noun 137 'eng /est neiu/fin' - full paradigm
     neitst+N+Sg+Nom: neitst
     neitst+N+Sg+Gen: [neitst, neitsõ]
     neitst+N+Sg+Par: neitstõ
     neitst+N+Sg+Dat: neitsõn
     neitst+N+Sg+Ins: neitsõks
     neitst+N+Sg+Ill: neitsõ
     neitst+N+Sg+Ela: neitsõst
     neitst+N+Pl+Nom: neitsõd
     neitst+N+Pl+Gen: neitsõd
     neitst+N+Pl+Par: neitsidi
     neitst+N+Pl+Dat: neitsõdõn
     neitst+N+Pl+Ins: neitsõdõks
     neitst+N+Pl+Ill: neitsiž
     neitst+N+Pl+Ela: neitsist
